Idaho, session 2026, H0735.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6628B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6628B. PAID IN-PERSON CANVASSING ACTIVITIES -- DISCLOSURES. (1)
For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Paid in-person canvassing activities" means canvassing activ-
ities performed by an individual who accepts financial compensation
for the purpose of influencing how a person votes, including but not
limited to soliciting personal residences or public locations to commu-
nicate with or distribute materials to possible voters about political
candidates or ballot measures; conducting in-person get-out-the-vote
efforts in relation to any candidate or ballot measure; and any other
direct, in-person contact or interaction intended to affect an individ-
ual's electoral participation or preferences.
(b) "Phone banking activities" means any organized outreach activity
in which telephone calls are made to Idaho qualified electors for the
purpose of persuading such electors to vote or to vote in a particular
manner, providing information to such electors regarding an election or
voting, or mobilizing such electors to vote.
(2) Persons who engage in any paid in-person canvassing activities
shall:
(a) Meet all of the qualifications of a qualified elector, as defined
in section 34-104, Idaho Code, except that a person under eighteen (18)
years of age shall only be required to have resided in this state for at
least thirty (30) days; and
(b) Verbally notify any person with whom they communicate that they are
being compensated to perform paid in-person canvassing activities and
provide the name of the person or entity providing payment for such paid
in-person canvassing activities.
(3) At all times while engaging in paid in-person canvassing activi-
ties, such persons shall wear a badge that is clearly visible to any person
with whom they intend to communicate with that contains the words "paid po-
litical advocate."
(4) The Idaho secretary of state shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section, which shall include specifications regard-


ing font, shape, color, and size requirements for the badge required pur-
suant to subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Volunteers acting without compensation or reimbursement beyond in-
cidental expenses;
(b) Individuals whose paid in-person canvassing activities are inci-
dental to broader campaign employment responsibilities;
(c) Phone banking activities; or
(d) Candidates engaged in in-person canvassing activities for their
own election campaign.
(6) The Idaho secretary of state shall establish a system on its website
to receive complaints for alleged violations of the provisions of this sec-
tion and shall investigate such complaints. If the secretary of state deter-
mines that a violation of this section has occurred, the secretary of state
shall refer the matter to the attorney general or the appropriate prosecut-
ing attorney for enforcement pursuant to section 67-6625, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6625, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6625. VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINE -- MISDEMEANOR PENALTY -- PROSECU-
TION -- LIMITATION -- VENUE. (1) Any person who violates the provisions of
sections 67-6603, 67-6604, 67-6606 through 67-6614A, 67-6624, 67-6627 or,
67-6628, or 67-6628B, Idaho Code, shall be liable for a civil fine not to ex-
ceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if an individual, and not more than two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) if a person other than an individual.
The burden of proof for such civil liability shall be met by showing a prepon-
derance of the evidence.
(2) Any person who violates section 67-6605, Idaho Code, and any per-
son who knowingly and willfully violates sections 67-6603 through 67-6614A,
67-6624, 67-6627 or, 67-6628, or 67-6628B, Idaho Code, is guilty of a misde-
meanor and, upon conviction, in addition to the fines set forth in subsection
(1) of this section, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or be
both fined and imprisoned.
(3) The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attorney may
prosecute any violations of this chapter.
(4) Prosecution for a civil or misdemeanor violation of this chapter
must be commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the violation
occurred. Prosecution for a felony violation of this chapter must be com-
menced pursuant to the provisions of section 19-402, Idaho Code.
(5) Venue for prosecution under the provisions of this chapter shall be
in the county of residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of
the state of Idaho, otherwise venue shall be in Ada county.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.